South Dakota, session 2026, HB1304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 50-15:
In accordance with § 50-15-10, a political subdivision may enact ordinances and
resolutions containing reasonable and necessary limitations on the operation of drones to
protect privacy and prevent trespass at:
(1) Parades;
(2) Outdoor festivals;
(3) The state fair;
(4) County fairs;
(5) Air shows;
(6) Sporting events; and
(7) Any other open-air event that draws large numbers of people.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.